TERMS OF SERVICE
Last updated: 04 June 2024
These Terms of Service are a contractual agreement between you and HouseMyDog Ltd, a company incorporated in Ireland, with a registered office at 21 Stradbrook Lawn, Blackrock, Co. Dublin, Ireland (“Gudog,” “we,” “us” and “our”).
The terms govern all use of the Gudog Service through our online web application https://www.gudog.com, or any localized version, and our mobile application (collectively the “Gudog Service” or “the Service”).
By using the service, you agree to comply with and be legally bound by these Terms of Service (“terms”), whether or not you become a registered user of the service. If you do not agree with these terms you do not have the right to use the Gudog service.
DEFINITIONS
Pet Owner
: means any person who searches for, contacts, and books Pet Care Services.
Service Provider
: means any person who creates a Pet Care Service. Service Providers can be either Individual Service Providers or Business Service Providers.
Individual Service Provider
: means any person who creates a Pet Care Service and is not operating as a registered business.
Business Service Provider
: means any person or entity that creates a Pet Care Service and operates as a registered business.
Guest Pet
: means any household pet and/or other pet with respect to which a Pet Owner is seeking and/or books Pet Care Services.
Services Profile
: means the public web page where Service Providers state their prices and information about the services they offer.
Pet Care Service
: means pet-related services provided by Service Providers including but not limited to home pet boarding, sitting, walking, training, or daycare.
Booking
: means any agreed transaction between Pet Owners and Service Providers for Pet Care Services that specifies the type of service, time period, fees and cancellation policy, and other provisions booked via the Gudog Service.
Content
: means text, graphics, images, music, software, audio, video, information, documents, compilations, data or other materials.
HOW IT WORKS
The Gudog Service allows for Pet Owners and Service Providers to arrange for the provision of Pet Care Services. Gudog is a neutral venue not a Service Provider and does not provide Pet Care Services. All transactions conducted via the Gudog Service are between Pet Owners and Service Providers Gudog’s role is to facilitate the transaction. Except for limited refunds and our emergency veterinary care policy, Gudog has no liability for damages associated with Pet Care Services or resulting from any other transactions between users of the Gudog Service.
Service Providers create a Services Profile to list information about their Pet Care Services including, but not limited to, type and availability of services offered, accommodation details and address, resident pets, pet care experience, pricing and financial terms. These profiles are publicly available via the Gudog Service. As Gudog does not produce the user Content provided for Service Profiles we are not responsible for its accuracy and cannot verify any claims made by Service Providers. Similarly, Gudog does not endorse reviews of Service Providers by other Pet Owners that may be available via the Gudog Service, and Gudog makes no commitments that such reviews are accurate or legitimate.
Pet Owners can interact with and book Pet Service Providers via Services Profiles. All booking requests are subject to acceptance by the Service Provider, who is not obligated to accept any request and may decline for any reason. However, once a Booking has been completed both the Service Provider and Pet Owner agree to honour the price and other terms of that Booking. Only Bookings made via the Gudog Service are valid and benefit from the protection the Service offers. Gudog charges fees for some aspects of the Gudog Service, as outlined the FEES AND PAYMENTS section of these Terms.
Pet Owners are solely responsible for evaluating the suitability of Service Providers. Gudoes makes no representations or warranties about the quality of Pet Care Services, or about interactions and dealings with users of the Service. Service Providers listed on Gudog are not under the direction or control of Gudog, and Service Providers determine at their own discretion how to provide Pet Care Services. Though Gudog provides general guidance to Service Providers about safety and pet care and to Pet Owners about selecting and engaging Service Providers, Gudog does not employ or endorse Service Providers or Pet Owners. While Gudog conducts an initial review of Services Profiles Gudog does not otherwise screen Service Providers and will not be responsible or liable for the performance or conduct of Service Providers or Pet Owners, whether online or offline.
USE OF THE SERVICE
To use certain aspects of the Service, you will be required to create a username, password, and user profile. You agree by registering, to provide accurate information about yourself and keep this information up-to-date. You are responsible for maintaining the confidentiality of your account information and are responsible for all activity under your account. When you use the Gudog Service, you agree:
To use the Service only in a lawful manner and only for its intended purposes as set out in these Terms.
To provide accurate and truthful information as required during the registration process, including providing the necessary information based on whether you are an individual or business service provider.
It is your obligation to comply with all applicable international, federal, and state laws, including tax laws and regulations that apply to your activity on the Service.
Not to provide false information in your profile, impersonate another person or entity, or create multiple or duplicate accounts.
Not to use the Service to arrange for the provision and purchase of services with another user, then complete transactions for those services outside of the Gudog Service.
Not to access or use the Service for competitive purposes or to post spam or promote other products or services.
Not to use the Service in any way that is intended to harm or send threatening or defamatory messages to other users, or to violate the legal rights (for example, privacy rights) of other users, to be determined at the sole discretion of Gudog.
Not to behave or act in any way that may cause upset or harm to Gudog employees, to be determined at the sole discretion of Gudog.
Not to post reviews about Service Providers that aren’t based on your personal experience, are intentionally inaccurate or misleading, or violate these Terms.
You have no rights in or to any portion of the Service other than the right to use them in accordance with these Terms of Service.
Not to use any tools to access, copy, acquire information, or monitor the Service or any portion or Content thereof.
Not to misuse the Service by knowingly introducing viruses, Trojans, worms, logic bombs, or other material which would harm the Service.
Gudog reserves the right, at its sole discretion, to terminate a user’s access to the Service due to any act that constitutes a violation of the Terms.
PET OWNER OBLIGATIONS
It is your sole responsibility to determine if the use of the Service is appropriate for your pet and to select a Service Provider. Gudog makes no representations or warranties regarding the quality of Service Providers or their residences. Gudog is not party to any agreement or transaction between the Pet Owner and Service Provider and therefore cannot verify or authenticate any claims made to a Service Provider.
You shall ensure that your pets are of good health, have been vaccinated and that all precautions for flea, parasite and other transmittable diseases have been taken.
You shall provide all relevant information to Service Providers regarding your pet(s), including but not limited to medical issues, behaviour issues, dietary restrictions, allergies or other conditions before a Booking commences.
You must allow the Service Provider to visit and/or inspect your pet(s).
You must be available for a Meet and Greet with your pet and Service Provider in all instances before a Booking commences.
You must ensure that the Service Provider is provided with relevant contact information to reach you, an alternative contact who would be able to take your pet(s), and your pet(s) veterinarian in the event of an emergency situation.
You agree that if you fail to retrieve your pet(s) after a Booking the Service Provider may at their sole discretion, place your pet(s) in alternative accommodation, foster care, animal control or with other law enforcement authorities. Further, you agree to reimburse the Service Provider for all costs and expenses associated with such actions.
You acknowledge that Gudog reserves the right, in its sole discretion, to remove your pet(s) from a Service Provider’s care should it be deemed necessary for the safety of a pet, the Service Provider, or any persons living with the Service Provider.
You agree that you are solely responsible to pay any applicable taxes that arise as a result of your use of the Gudog Service. This includes, without limitation, any form of sales tax, VAT, or income tax on fees paid or received by you through the Gudog Service.
SERVICE PROVIDER OBLIGATIONS
You acknowledge that all Service Providers must be compliant with local laws and regulations regarding licensing and other requirements. You agree that Gudog is not liable for Service Providers having obtained all business licenses, permits, other permissions and fulfilled any other necessary requirements to legally provide Pet Care Services.
You agree that you, and others living in your residence, are voluntarily agreeing to offer Pet Care Services.
You agree to freely and voluntarily provide all necessary information required for your Services Profile including your name, address and pet care experience and you acknowledge that this information will be made public on your Services Profile.
You agree Gudog reserves the right to reject an application to become a Service Provider if we determine in our sole discretion that the applicant is not appropriate. We have no obligation to disclose the reason for our decision to reject an application.
You shall request all relevant information from Pet Owners regarding Guest Pet(s), including but not limited to medical issues, behaviour issues, dietary restrictions, allergies or other conditions before a Booking commences.
You will be available for a Meet and Greet with the Pet Owner and Guest Pet(s) in all instances before a Booking commences.
You agree that you shall keep a register containing a description of any pets received into your care, date of arrival and departure, daily activity logs during Pet Care Services and the name and address of the Pet Owner.
You agree that all Pet Care Services shall be supplied using reasonable skill and care, particularly in relation to accommodation, welfare and disease control.
You agree that you shall keep all pets on a lead in public areas.
You agree to follow all necessary measures to ensure pets have safe journeys in public or private transport. You will always comply with local legal regulations for each type of transport and ensure pick-up and/or drop-off is made at the scheduled time agreed between yourself and the Pet Owner.
You agree to keep the Pet Owner regularly updated as to the health of Guest Pets, and to respond promptly to any request from the Pet Owner during a Booking.
You agree that the first and all future Bookings made with a Pet Owner introduced by Gudog will be booked via the Service and that failure to abide by this policy will lead to suspension or termination from the Service.
You agree to grant Gudog a perpetual, non-exclusive, fully paid worldwide license to use, copy, perform, publicly display, reproduce, adapt, modify, transmit, broadcast, prepare derivative works of, and/or distribute your Content in connection with providing and/or promoting the Gudog Service, and to sublicense these rights to third parties.
You agree that you are solely responsible to pay any applicable taxes that arise as a result of your use of the Gudog Service. This includes, without limitation, any form of sales tax, VAT, or income tax on fees paid or received by you through the Gudog Service.
EMPLOYMENT
Gudog is not an employment service and does not serve as an employer of any user signing up to the Service. Service Providers are solely responsible for disclosing any income made through Bookings via the Service and for complying with national, federal and state tax laws and regulations that apply to their activity on the Service. Gudog will not be liable for any tax or withholding, including but not limited to unemployment insurance, employers liability, social security, in connection with your use of the Service. If Gudog is found to be liable for any tax in connection with Service Providers’ use of the Service, all Service Providers agree they will immediately reimburse and pay to Gudog an equivalent amount including any penalties and interest incurred.
LOCAL REGULATIONS
By using the Gudog Service, you certify that you: are at least 18 years of age and will comply with all laws and regulations applicable to your activities conducted through the Gudog Service.
Pet Owners will ensure that your pets are vaccinated, licensed, identification-tagged and/or microchipped as required by local laws or regulations; that you have obtained and will maintain any mandatory insurance policies concerning the pets whose care you entrust to Service Providers (and that such policies will benefit third parties, including Service Providers, to the same extent they benefit you).
Service Providers will ensure you are legally eligible to provide Pet Care Services in the jurisdiction where you provide Pet Care Services; that you have complied and will comply with all laws and regulations, and have obtained all business licenses and permits necessary to legally provide Pet Care Services; and that, when providing Pet Care Services, you will comply with local pet welfare laws to ensure pets are kept in suitable accommodation, provided with adequate food, drink and bedding, regularly exercised, safeguarded in an emergency and protected from infectious disease.
COMPLIANCE WITH THE DIGITAL SERVICES ACT (DSA)
Gudog is committed to ensuring a safe and transparent environment for our users. In compliance with the DSA, we have implemented the following measures:
Single Point of Contact
For any regulatory inquiries, please contact:
Name: Timothy McElroy
Email: info@gudog.com
Statements of Reasons
If we decide to restrict your access to our services, you will be provided with a statement of reasons, including the basis for our decision.
Reporting Mechanisms
Users can report illegal content or terms violations through our reporting system at info@gudog.com. Please follow this format for reporting:
Subject:
Notice of Illegal Content
Details:
Explanation of why the content is illegal, the exact location (URL), and any supporting evidence.
Your Information:
Include your name and email.
Statement:
“I confirm that I have a good faith belief that the information and allegations contained in this notice are accurate and complete.”
Transparency and User Rights
We ensure transparency in our operations. Users have the right to report any illegal content or violations of our terms of service. We are committed to providing transparent and prompt responses to such reports.
Service Provider Information
Service Providers on Gudog are required to provide the following information:
Business Service Providers
:
Business name
Business address*
Business phone number*
Business VAT number*
Individual Service Providers
:
Personal home address*
Email address*
Phone number*
Tax Identification Number*
*This information will not be publicly displayed unless required as part of the normal service (eg sharing address location with a confirmed booking).
FEES AND PAYMENT
Service Providers may set the price of Pet Care Services within the parameters persmitted by the Service. Gudog charges a Service Fee equal to 15% of the Booking to Service Providers to cover costs that include, but are not limited to: payment processing, customer support, site administration, veterinary cover, and marketing.
Pet Owners may purchase Pet Care Services from a Service Provider by completing the Booking procedure as follows:
The Pet Owner will select a Service Provider from the list of registered on the Gudog Service.
To send a booking request to a Service Provider the Pet Owner will be required to complete a form with details including their name, telephone number, postcode, details of Guest Pet(s), the type Pet Care Service sought and the date(s) they wish the Pet Care Service to be carried out.
A Booking will not be confirmed unless accepted by the Service Provider.
Once a booking has been accepted the full amount of the Booking will be charged to the Pet Owner’s card immediately. This may also include a service fee payable to Gudog, and where required by law, the amount charged will also be inclusive of applicable taxes.
Gudog will initiate payment to Service Providers the next business day after completion of a Booking.
When paying for Pet Care Services, Pet Owners will be required to provide Gudog with a valid, up-to-date credit card or other payment information and to maintain an acceptable payment method on account so long as the Pet Owner has any outstanding Bookings. Gudog will validate payment information upon submission of a Booking. Payment details are securely stored by payment processing service Mangopay. Pet Owners authorise Gudog to charge their payment method for fees incurred on the Gudog Service as they become payable. Gudog reserves the right to reject or cancel any Booking at its distraction, and to hold any amounts otherwise payable to Service Provider’s if there is reasonable suspicion of fraudulent activity.
Payment processing services are provided by Mangopay and are subject to the Mangopay General Terms and Conditions of Use (the “Mangopay Terms”). By agreeing to these terms or continuing to use the Gudog Service, you agree to be bound by the Mangopay Terms, which may be modified by Mangopay from time to time. You agree to provide Gudog accurate and complete information about you and your business, and you authorise Gudog to share it and transaction information related to your use of the payment processing services provided by Mangopay. Gudog reserves the right to switch payment processing vendors or use alternate or backup vendors at its discretion.
CANCELLATIONS & REFUNDS
Users can cancel a Booking at any time through the Gudog Service. All refunds will be made to the same payment method used to confirm a Booking.
If a Pet Owner makes a cancellation more than 3 days before the Booking is scheduled to begin, Gudog will refund the Booking payment to the Pet Owner, excluding the Gudog Service fee.
If a Pet Owner makes a cancellation less than 3 days before the Booking is scheduled to begin, Gudog will refund the Booking payment to the Pet Owner, excluding the Gudog Service fee and 50% of the Booking amount owed to the Pet Sitter.
If a Service Provider makes a cancellation Booking prior to or during a Booking Gudog will refund the Booking payment to the Pet Owner, including the Gudog Service fee. Service Provider’s that repeatedly cancel confirmed Bookings may be temporarily or permanently removed from the Gudog Service.
Gudog will determine, at our own discretion, whether a Service Provider has failed to provide Pet Care Services as agreed and whether a full or partial refund will be issued to the Pet Owner.
Gudog initiates payments to Service Providers the next business day after completion of a Booking. Once these amounts have been disbursed, any further payment disputes are between the Pet Owner and Service Provider, and Gudog has no obligation to mediate or facilitate any resolution.
EMERGENCY VETERINARY CARE
If a situation arises where a Guest Pet requires emergency veterinary care, Service Providers are required to make reasonable efforts to inform the Pet Owner and Gudog as soon as possible. If the Pet Owner cannot be reached following reasonable efforts, the Pet Owner authorises the Service Provider to promptly seek treatment for Guest Pets. The Pet Owner agrees that they will bear the full cost of any such emergency medical treatment and will reimburse the Service Provider accordingly for any medical payments made by the Service Provider. The Pet Owner may be able to have the cost of such emergency medical treatment fully or partially reimbursed by Gudog through the Gudog Emergency Vet Care policy. This policy covers certain veterinary fees, up to a maximum of €500 per Booking (or equivalent in local currency), arising out of an incident in connection with a Booking where a Guest Pet(s) requires:
An Emergency visit to a veterinarian.
The cost of medicine and/or some surgeries.
In order to qualify for Veterinary Reimbursement, Pet Owners must comply with all obligations set out in our Gudog Emergency Vet Care policy. Where a Pet Owner wishes to make a claim for Veterinary Reimbursement, Gudog will assess the claim, which may take up to 2 weeks, and shall, in good faith, solely determine whether the Pet Owner has satisfied the Terms. This policy will only be applicable where Pet Owners have sought reimbursement under their own insurance and reimbursement was denied or to the extent that the reimbursement does not cover all related costs. We may request any documentation regarding insurance claims made by you to your own insurance provider.
Nothing in this clause limits any liability the Service Provider owes to the Pet Owner or Gudog in connection with the Pet Care Services.
TERMINATION AND ACCOUNT CANCELLATION
You may cancel your Gudog account at any time by sending an email to info@gudog.com. If your Account is cancelled, you will be personally and solely liable for any pending transactions that you place or charges that you incur prior to your termination/cancellation.
You understand and agree that we have no obligation to provide the Gudog Service in any specific location or territory, nor to continue providing it once we have begun. Gudog reserves the right, at its sole discretion and without liability to you, with or without cause, with or without prior notice and at any time (a) terminate these Terms or your access to the Service, and (b) delete or modify your User Content (c) deactivate or cancel your Account or registration or similar uses of the Service. Gudog  may provide notice of termination by regular mail or email.
In the event of account termination or cancellation Our proprietary rights, disclaimer of warranties, indemnities, limitations of liability and miscellaneous provisions shall survive any such termination and Gudog will also have no obligation to delete or return user Content that you have posted to the Service and will not offer compensation for any losses.
LIABILITY
To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, in no event will Gudog, its affiliates, officers, directors, employees, agents, as well as its third party providers, be liable for any damages whatsoever, whether direct, indirect, general, special, compensatory, and/or consequential, arising out of or relating to the conduct of you or anyone else in connection with the Gudog Service, including without limitation (a) any injuries, harm or death suffered by you or any third party; (b) emotional distress; (c) any destruction of information; (d) failure of the Service Provider to provide services to the Pet Owner; (e) any disputes between a Service Provider and/or Pet Owner; (f) any injuries or harm suffered by any pets; (g) any damage or harm to personal property or belongings; any other conduct, act or omission of any other party, and/or any other damages resulting from reliance on information or Content posted on or transmitted through the Gudog service, or for any interactions with other users of the Gudog service, whether online or offline. This includes any claims, losses or damages arising from the conduct of users who attempt to defraud or harm you. In no event will Gudog be liable for direct or indirect consequences of a Pet Owner or Service Provider failing to comply with applicable laws and regulations.
In no event will Gudog be liable to you for any indirect, special, incidental, or consequential damages, or for any business losses, or loss of profit, revenue, contracts, data, goodwill or other similar losses or expenses that arise out of or relate to the use of or inability to use the Gudog Service, including without limitation damages related to any information received from the Gudog Service, removal of your profile information or review (or other Content) from the Gudog Service, any suspension or termination of your access to the Gudog Service, or any failure, error, omission, interruption, defect, delay in operation or transmission of the Gudog Service, even if we are aware of the possibility of any such damages, losses or expenses.
Except for the limited reimbursements approved by Gudog under the Gudog Emergency Vet Care Policy and the refund amounts payable by Gudog that are set forth in these Terms of Service, in no event will Gudog’s aggregate liability to you or any third party in any matter arising from or relating to the Gudog service or these terms exceed the amounts paid by you to Gudog (specifically excluding amounts paid to Service Providers) during the twelve (12) months preceding the event that gave rise to liability or, if you have not paid Gudog for the use of any services, the amount of €100.00 (or equivalent in local currency).
You are solely responsible for any relationship, agreement or arrangement between you and another user, and enter any transaction or dealings with another user at your own risk. You accept liability for any decision made or action taken in reliance on any information contained or omitted from the Service. If you have a dispute with a Service Provider or Pet Owner you agree you release Gudog, its affiliates, officers, directors, employees, agents from any and all claims, demands and damages of every kind and nature, known or unknown, arising out of or in any way connected with such disputes.
PRIVACY
Any personal information submitted to the Service is governed by our Privacy Policy. By accessing or using the Gudog Service, you acknowledge that you have read and understand our Privacy Policy. The Service requires use of and/or may contain links to third party websites or resources (such as Google Maps). You acknowledge and agree that we are not responsible or liable for the availability or accuracy of such websites or resources; the Content, products, or services on or available from such websites or resources. You acknowledge sole responsibility for and assume all risk arising from your use of any such websites or resources.
INDEMNIFICATION
You shall defend indemnify, and hold harmless Gudog and its affiliates, directors, officers, employees, agendas, and third party providers against any and all claims, demands, causes of action, losses, expenses, damages and/or liabilities, including reasonable legal fees and court costs, or other liability, for any claim of infringement arising from (a) use of the Service services; (b) transactions and interactions, online or offline, with other users of the Service; (c) breach of these Terms; (d) disputes with other users of the Service; (e) your misstatements, misrepresentations, or violation of applicable law; (f) property damage or personal injury to third parties caused by your pet or pets in your care; (g) Your Content.
DISCLAIMER OF WARRANTIES
The Content and services found on the Gudog Service, including text, graphics, information, links or other items, are provided "as is". Reviews, profiles, advice, opinions, statements, offers, or other information or Content made available through the service, but not directly by Gudog, are those of their respective authors, who are solely responsible for such Content. To the maximum extent permitted by applicable law, Gudog, its affiliates, officers, directors, employees, agents, as well as its third party providers, expressly disclaims all warranties, whether express, implied or statutory, with respect to the Gudog service, warranties of merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, non-infringement, and accuracy. In addition Gudog expressly disclaims any warranty regarding the suitability of any Service Provider that offers Pet Care Services via the Gudog service.
INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY RIGHTS
All materials provided on the Service, including but not limited to Content, information, documents, products, logos, graphics, sounds, images, compilations, and services are protected by copyrights and trademarks, owned by Gudiog, its affiliates or respective third party authors, developers or vendors. Except as stated herein, none of the materials may be modified, copied, printed, reproduced, distributed, republished, performed, downloaded, displayed, posted, transmitted and/or otherwise used in any form or by any means, including but not limited to electronic, mechanical, photocopying, recording, or other means, without the prior express written permission of Gudog. Other than as allowed in these Terms of Service you are not given a right to use the "Gudog" name, or any of the "Gudog" trademarks, logos, domain names and other distinctive brand features.
CHANGES TO THE SERVICE
Gudog will constantly update and improve the Service to offer new and innovative features and services. As a result we may need to update, reset, stop offering and/or supporting a particular part of the Service, or feature relating to the Service. These changes to the Service may affect, delete or reset your past activities on the Service, features that you use, your Service Profile and/or your User Content. You agree that a key characteristic of our Service is that changes to the Service will take place over time and this is an important basis on which we grant you access to the Service. Once we have made changes to the Service, your continued use of the Service will show that you have accepted any changes to the Service. You are free at a time to stop using the Service or terminate your account.
CHANGES TO THE TERMS
You understand and agree that we may change the Terms from time to time, and that any such changes will be effective when we post the modified Terms on the Gudog Service, unless otherwise required by applicable law. Your continued access and use of the Gudog Service after we post the modified Terms will constitute your consent to be bound by the modified Terms.
SEVERABILITY
If any provision of these Terms of Service is judged to be illegal or unenforceable, this will not affect the continuation in full force and affect the remainder of the provisions.
GOVERNING LAW
These terms are governed by the laws of Ireland. Irish law will apply to all disputes and the interpretation of these Terms of Service. The Irish courts will have non-exclusive jurisdiction over any dispute arising from or related to your use of the Service.
DISPUTES AND CONTACT
If you have any disputes, questions or concerns about the Gudog Service, these terms, or any other document mentioned within, please contact us via email at info@gudog.com.
MANGOPAY PAYMENT SERVICES FRAMEWORK AGREEMENT
General Terms and Conditions of Use for Payment Services
Version as of 1 September 2021
Concluded between:
The customer, whether a legal person or a natural person registered with the Commercial and Companies Registry in a Member State of the European Union or in a State party to the European Economic Area or in a third country imposing equivalent obligations regarding the fight against money laundering and the financing of terrorism, acting on its behalf exclusively for professional purposes (commercial, industrial, craft or freelance professions),
hereinafter referred to as the
"Account Holder"
or
"Professional Account Holder"
,
or
The customer, a natural person residing in a Member State of the European Union or in a State party to the European Economic Area or in a third country imposing equivalent obligations regarding the fight against money laundering and the financing of terrorism, acting on its behalf exclusively for non-professional purposes,
hereinafter referred to as the
"Account Holder"
or
Consumer Account Holder"
, on the one hand, and
MANGOPAY SA
, a limited liability company under Luxembourg law, having its registered office at 2, Avenue Amélie, L-1125 Luxembourg and registered with the Luxembourg Commerce and Companies Registry under number B173459 (the amount of the share capital can be can be consulted here :
https://www.mangopay.com/legal-notice/
), authorised to carry out business within the European Economic Area, as an electronic money institution approved by the Commission de Surveillance du Secteur Financier, 283 route d'Arlon L-1150 Luxembourg,
www.cssf.lu
,
hereinafter referred to as the
"Service Provider"
, on the other hand,
hereinafter referred to separately as a
"Party"
or together as the
"Parties"
.
Disclaimer
The Account Holder is invited to carefully read this Framework Agreement communicated to them by the Platform before accepting it. The Account Holder is invited to download it on a Durable Medium. By default, communications with the Service Provider are always carried out via the Platform, in accordance with the terms and conditions set out in the General Terms and Conditions of the Website, except where a separate mode of communication is provided for in the Agreement.
1. Definitions
For the purposes hereof, the following terms are defined as follows:
"Authentication"
means the procedures defined by the Platform to verify the identity of the Account Holder or the validity of a Payment Order. These procedures include the use of Identification Data.
"Banks"
means the credit institutions in charge of protecting the funds collected by the Service Provider on behalf of the Account Holder. These funds are recorded in its records in an escrow account opened for this purpose with an institution designated by the Service Provider. The Service Provider reserves the right to select any other approved credit institution.
"Beneficiary"
means a legal or natural person who is a creditor of a Payment Transaction issued by the Account Holder.
"Card"
means the bank, charge or credit card used to transfer funds to a named Account Holder on their Payment Account opened in the Service Provider's records. This card is attached to one of the following card networks: Visa, MasterCard or CB.
"Payment Account" or "Account"
means the Payment Account operated by the Service Provider in the name of the Account Holder and used for the purpose of implementing payment transactions. In no case shall the Account be treated as a deposit account. The Account is denominated in the currency indicated on the Website upon registering.
"General Terms and Conditions of the Website"
means the general terms and conditions of use of the Website concluded between the users of the Website and the Platform, governing, in particular, access to the Website.
"Framework Agreement"
means these General Terms and Conditions of Use for Payment Services, together with the Subscription Form, governing the use of the Payment Services and the management of the Payment Account by the Service Provider.
"Identification Data"
means the Account Holder's unique identifier and password enabling them to access their Personal Space.
"personal information"
means any information relating to the Account Holder as a natural person, or to a natural person related to the Account Holder as a legal person (in particular, a designated company representative, a beneficial owner, an Authorised Person), within the meaning of European Regulation 2016/679 on the protection of personal information.
"Personal Space"
means the Account Holder's dedicated environment, accessible on the Platform Website, enabling them to access their Payment Account and use the Payment Services.
"Subscription Form"
means the form to be completed by any prospective customer wishing to subscribe to the Payment Services, accessible on the Website upon registration or made available by the Platform.
"Business Day"
means a calendar day except Saturdays, Sundays and public holidays in mainland France and Luxembourg, and any other day designated as such by the Service Provider.
"Payment Method"
means the payment method other than the Card, listed on the Website, the acquisition of which is offered by the Service Provider as an option. The Account Holder activates the Payment Method of their choice from their Personal Space.
"Payment Transaction"
means a periodic or one-off transfer, ordered by the Account Holder, or by any authorised representative, debiting the Payment Account.
"Payment Order"
means the instruction given by the Account Holder to the Service Provider in accordance with the procedure set out in the Framework Agreement to carry out a Payment Transaction.
"Payment Page"
means the page secured by the Service Provider's electronic payment service provider
"Data Subject"
means the Account Holder as a natural person or any natural person related to the Account Holder (in particular, a designated company representative, a beneficial owner, an Authorised Person) whose personal information is processed in the context of the implementation of this Framework Agreement.
"Authorised Person"
means any agent appointed by the Account Holder to access the Payment Account and use the Payment Services on its behalf.
"Platform"
means the entity, whose contact details are indicated in the General Terms and Conditions of the Website, that operates the Website. It prepares, facilitates and advises prospective customers with a view to the conclusion of the Framework Agreement via its Website. It assists Account Holders throughout their relationship with the Service Provider in carrying out their Payment Transactions. It collects the documents required to open the Account. The Platform does not collect funds except its fees..
"Service Provider"
means MANGOPAY SA, an issuer of Electronic Money approved in Luxembourg by the Commission de Surveillance du Secteur Financier under reference No. 3812 and authorised to carry out its activity in all member countries of the European Union. The Service Provider is included in the list of electronic money institutions available at
https://searchentities.apps.cssf.lu/searchentities/search?language=fr#Home.
"Third-Party Payment Service Provider"
or
"Third-Party PSP"
means any institution, other than the Service Provider, authorised in a country that is a member of the European Union or a party to the European Economic Area or in a third country imposing equivalent obligations regarding the fight against money laundering and the financing of terrorism.
"Platform's Customer Service Department"
means the service whose contact details are stated on the Website, from which the Account Holder may obtain information relating to the Framework Agreement.
"Payment Services"
means the payment services defined in points 3 and 5 of the Appendix to the Luxembourg Law of 10 November 2009 relating to payment services.
"Website"
means the website operated by the Platform, the purpose of which is to sell goods or services to Users or to collect funds from them, or to put Account Holders in contact with Users.
"Durable Medium"
means any instrument that enables the Account Holder to store information addressed personally to the Account Holder in order to be able to refer to it at a later date for a period of time appropriate to the purpose for which the information is intended and that enables the identical reproduction of the stored information. This is usually in the form of a PDF file.
"Account Holder"
means any legal person or natural person acting on its own behalf and in whose name a Payment Account is opened to use the Payment Services.
"User"
means any legal person or natural person who has transferred funds to an Account Holder through the Website using their Card or any other Payment Method accepted by the Service Provider to transfer funds.
2. Purpose
The purpose of the Framework Agreement is to define the conditions under which the Service Provider provides Payment Services to the Account Holder..
These Payment Services include:
the opening and management of Payment Accounts,
crediting the Payment Account: the registration of funds transferred by Cards or by any other Payment Method accepted by the Service Provider; the receipt of transfers.
debiting the Payment Account: the implementation of one-off or recurring Transfer Transactions, the charging of fees due hereunder, the reversal of transfers of funds by Cards (or by any other Payment Method).
The Account shall not be subject to any overdraft, advance, credit or discount. The Service Provider does not offer a currency exchange service.
The Service Provider has authorised the Platform to facilitate the conclusion of this Agreement with each Account Holder and to support them throughout their relationship with the Service Provider.
3. Subscribing to the Services
3.1. Subscription Terms and Conditions
The Framework Agreement is concluded remotely, according to the terms and conditions provided by the Platform in the General Terms and Conditions of the Website. In order to be able to conclude the Framework Agreement online, the applicant must have access to equipment (hardware and software), for which it is solely responsible.
By default, acceptance of the Framework Agreement is carried out remotely via the Website and is confirmed by an electronic signature. The applicant may request to sign the Agreement by hand. To this end, the Applicant must print this Agreement, sign it, and return it electronically or by post to the Platform's Customer Service Department, the contact details of which are indicated in the General Terms and Conditions of the Website.
In case of a handwritten signature, the date of conclusion of the Framework Agreement is deemed to be the date indicated on it, and in the absence of a date, it will be deemed to be the date of receipt of the Framework Agreement by the Platform.
The electronic signature of the Framework Agreement is carried out via the Website. The date of conclusion of the Framework Agreement corresponds to the date on which the applicant completes the electronic signature process indicated on the Website
The Framework Agreement concluded between the Parties by electronic means shall have the same probative value as a paper Framework Agreement.
3.2. Contractual Documents
The Framework Agreement is composed of:
these General Terms and Conditions of Use for Payment Services,
the Subscription Form available on the Website,
These General Terms and Conditions of Use for Payment Services are made available to the Account Holder on the Website and can be downloaded on a Durable Medium. At any time during the contractual relationship, the Account Holder may, upon request, receive these documents in paper form
4. Opening an Account
4.1. Necessary Conditions and Prerequisites for Opening an Account
Any natural person aged at least eighteen (18) years who is legally capable, and any legal person, resident and/or registered in a Member State of the European Union or in a State party to the Agreement on the European Economic Area or in a third country imposing equivalent obligations regarding the fight against money laundering and the financing of terrorism, may submit an application to open an Account provided that the natural person is listed on the Website as a consumer or as a professional. A legal person can only be listed as a professional.
Upon submission of the Account Holder's application for registration to the Platform and throughout the duration of the Framework Agreement, the Account Holder declares:
that they are at least eighteen (18) years of age and legally capable, or that they are duly constituted as a company,
that they are acting on their own behalf;
that all the information provided at the time of registration is true, accurate and up to date.
4.2. Registration and Account Opening Procedure
4.2.1. Information and Supporting Documents
Prospective Customers shall provide the Platform with the information and documents listed below, using the Application Form, if the said information and documents are not already in the Platform’s possession.
The prospective customer undertakes to transmit the information and documents corresponding to its capacity, either as a professional or as a consumer.
For a Consumer Account Holder as a natural person:
their surname, first name, email address, date and place of birth, nationality and country of residence
a copy of a valid official identity document of the Account Holder (e.g., identity card, driving licence and, for non-EU nationals, a passport).
For a Professional Account Holder:
for natural persons:
their surname, first name, email address, date of birth, nationality and country of residence.
an original or a copy of an extract from the official register, dated less than three (3) months ago, establishing the registration as a trader or in the national register of trades or any other professional body to which the Account Holder belongs.
a copy of a valid official identity document of the Account Holder (e.g., identity card, driving licence and, for non-EU nationals, a passport).
for legal persons:
their name, type of organisation, capital, the address of their registered office, the 6 description of their activity, the identity of the partners and corporate managers, as well as the list of beneficial owners as defined by the regulations,
a Kbis extract (Certificate of Incorporation) or an equivalent document less than three (3) months old justifying its registration with the Commercial and Companies Registry of a Member State of the European Union or of a State party to the Agreement on the European Economic Area or of a third country imposing equivalent obligations regarding the fight against money laundering and the financing of terrorism, and its articles of association. This document must state the name, legal status, address of the registered office and the identity of the partners and corporate managers mentioned in Section 1 and Section 2 of Article R.123-54 of the French Commercial Code or their equivalents in foreign law.
a copy of the articles of association and any decisions appointing the certified legal representative;
a copy of the identity card or passport of the legal representative and, if applicable, of the beneficial owner(s).
The declaration of the beneficial owners of the legal person holding more than 25%, if the prospective customer has not declared their beneficial owners in the national register, or if they are not subject to this obligation.
The Account Holder may also be asked to provide a bank statement for an account opened in their name with a Third-Party PSP.
It is expressly provided that the Service Provider reserves the right to request, prior to any registration and at any time during the duration of the Framework Agreement, additional documents concerning the Account Holder, the beneficial owner or a specific Payment Transaction.
4.2.2. Payment Account Limitation
At the discretion of the Service Provider, the use of a Payment Account may be limited without the Service Provider needing to justify its decision to the Account Holder concerned. In particular, the operation of the Payment Account will be limited if the Account Holder has not transmitted all the information and documents required by the Service Provider, as listed above. These limits are indicated to the Account Holder by the Platform.
4.2.3. Finalisation of the Registration Process
After concluding the Framework Agreement, the Account Holder must provide all the information and supporting documents requested by the Platform. By agreeing to the terms of the Framework Agreement, the Account Holder agrees that the Platform may forward to the Service Provider its application for registration as an Account Holder and all supporting documents received by it.
Only the Service Provider can accept the registration of a prospective customer as a Payment Account Holder on behalf of the prospective customer. This agreement will be notified to the Account Holder by the Platform by any means in accordance with the terms and conditions set out on the Website.
Only the Service Provider can accept the registration of a prospective customer as a Payment Account Holder on behalf of the prospective customer. This agreement will be notified to the Account Holder by the Platform by any means in accordance with the terms and conditions set out on the Website.
5. Payment Account Operation
The amounts credited to the Payment Account result from funds transferred by Card (or by any other 7 Payment Method accepted by the Service Provider), or from the receipt of a transfer. The amounts debited to the Payment Account result from: the implementation of a Payment Order to an account opened in the records of a Third-Party Payment Service Provider, the debiting by the Provider of the fees owed by the Account Holder under the Framework Agreement, or the reversal of a transaction by Card (or by any other Payment Method).
5.1. Acquiring Payment Orders by Cards on the Payment Account
The Payment Account may be funded by Card (or any other Payment Method accepted by the Service Provider), in one or more instalments. When the User wishes to carry out such an operation, they must identify themselves on the Website by indicating their User identifier (valid email address) and password or by logging in via their Facebook account. The order for the transfer of funds is entered on a dedicated Payment Page. For any payment, the User may be asked to enter a single-use code notified on their mobile phone to the institution issuing the Card. If necessary, it is the Service Provider's responsibility to refuse any payment at its own discretion and without this decision giving rise to any compensation whatsoever. The funds transfer transaction is carried out by the institution issuing the Card. Any dispute of such a transfer must be notified to the aforementioned institution. The Service Provider is not entitled to cancel such a transfer.
The Cardholder is informed that the acceptance of a Card payment order by the Service Provider does not guarantee the receipt of the corresponding funds by the Account Holder on their Account. The registration of funds on the Account Holder's Payment Account is subject to actual receipt by the Service Provider of the funds.
In the absence of receipt of funds for technical reasons, the Service Provider shall use its best efforts to rectify the transaction. If the funds are not received for any other reason, the Service Provider shall inform the Account Holder as soon as possible of its inability to credit its Account with the expected amount, so that the Account Holder may contact the User.
In the event that the transfer of funds from the Account Holder's Account is cancelled by the Card issuer following a dispute by the User, the Account Holder agrees that the Service Provider may reverse any Card funds transfer transaction by debiting the corresponding amount from the Payment Account. The Cardholder acknowledges that such a dispute may, in particular, be brought to the attention of the Card issuer until the expiry of a maximum period of thirteen (13) months following the date of debit of the account with which the Card is associated. In the absence of sufficient funds in the Account in order to carry out such a reversal, the Service Provider may suspend or cancel any Payment Transaction initiated by the Account Holder or an agent, or, where applicable, assume the rights of the Account Holder and proceed to recover the amounts due by the User by any means.
5.2. Receipt of Transfer to the Payment Account
The Account Holder authorises the Service Provider to receive on its Payment Account SEPA credit transfer transactions in euros from a bank or payment account opened in the records of a Third-Party PSP.
The funds are credited to their Payment Account by the Service Provider as soon as possible following their actual receipt by the Service Provider.
Once the funds have been paid to the Account Holder's Payment Account, the Service Provider provides the Account Holder with a summary of the received transfer transaction, including the following information: the reference of the payment transaction, a reference to identify the payer, the amount of the transaction, and the credit's value date.
5.3.Implementation of a Transfer Transaction Debiting the Payment Account
The Account Holder may transmit SEPA or international Transfer Orders to a Beneficiary's account held by a Third-Party PSP.
When the Account Holder wishes to carry out a Transfer Transaction, the Account Holder identifies themself in their Personal Space by indicating their Identification Data and, where applicable, by following the Authentication procedure indicated. It indicates on the Payment Page: the amount of the Payment Transaction, the currency, the Payment Account to be debited, the implementation date of the Order and any other required information. In the absence of any indication of date, the Transfer Order is deemed to be immediate. The Account Holder must also follow the Authentication procedure specified by the Provider.
The Account Holder may at any time send a request to implement a Transfer Order to a Beneficiary designated by it who has a bank or payment account with a Third-Party Payment Service Provider. The Account Holder must provide the reason for each transfer and comply with the Authentication procedure indicated by the Service Provider.
The Account Holder gives irrevocable consent to the Payment Order by clicking on the “Validation” tab (“Date of Receipt”). The receipt of the Payment Order is confirmed on the Account Holder's Personal Space. The Account Holder may not withdraw any Order after the date on which it is deemed to be irrevocable, i.e., from the Date of Receipt.
Before transmitting a Transfer Order, the Account Holder (or the Platform acting on its behalf) must ensure that it has sufficient funds available in its Account to cover the amount of the Payment Transaction. Where applicable, the Account Holder shall credit its Account before the Order can be validly transmitted to the Service Provider for implementation.
It is hereby expressly agreed that Payment Orders will be executed no later than the end of the Business Day following the Date of Receipt of the Order by the Service Provider (and on the agreed implementation date for deferred or standing order transfers). Any payment order received after 4 p.m. by the Service Provider is deemed to have been received on the next Business Day. If the Date of Receipt is not a Business Day, the Payment Order is deemed to have been received on the next Business Day.
For each Transfer Transaction, the Account Holder may request the Service Provider to provide information on a Durable Medium relating to the maximum implementation period for that specific transaction, the fees to be paid by the Account Holder and, where applicable, the details of such fees.
The Service Provider may refuse to implement an incomplete or erroneous Transfer Order. The Account Holder shall re-issue the Order to ensure its compliance. The Service Provider may, in addition, block a Transfer Order in the event of serious suspicion of fraudulent use of the Account, unauthorised use of the Account, breach of the security of the Account, in the event of an asset-freezing measure by an administrative authority or for any other reason.
In the event of a refusal to implement a Transfer Order or the blocking of a Transfer Order, the Service Provider shall inform the Account Holder by any means. If possible, the Service Provider will indicate to the Account Holder the reasons for the refusal or blocking, unless prohibited by a relevant provision of national or European Union law.
5.4. Refund
The Holder may at any time send an instruction to cancel a funds transfer in order to refund a User. The Account Holder identifies themselves on the Website by indicating their identifier and password. The Account Holder indicates, in their Personal Space, the amount to be refunded, the currency, the User to be refunded and any other information required.
The refund transaction is implemented by the Service Provider by crediting the Card used by the User or by transfer according to the original payment method, within the limit of the available balance on the Account and within the rules of each network and the SEPA rules within five (5) Business Days following receipt by the Service Provider of the refund request.
6. Reporting
The Account Holder has, in their Personal Space, a statement of the payment transactions carried out on the Payment Account. The Account Holder is invited to read the list of these transactions carefully. Transaction records may also be made available to a Professional Account Holder at other intervals upon specific request.
It is specified that for each Transfer Transaction implemented by the Service Provider, the Account Holder will be provided with the following information: the reference number of the Transaction, the identification of the Beneficiary, the amount of the Transaction, the date of receipt of the Order and, where applicable, the fees relating to the implementation of this Transaction.
7. Payment Account Access and Confidentiality
The Payment Account is accessible online in the Personal Space, using Identification Data and in accordance with the requested Authentication procedure.
The Account Holder shall provide Identification Data for each Authorised Person. Each Authorised Person shall agree not to use the name or Identification Data of another person. The Account Holder shall be solely responsible for any use of their identifier.
Each Authorised Person is fully responsible for maintaining the confidentiality of their Identification Data. The Account Holder shall take all reasonable steps in order to maintain the confidentiality and security of its Identification Data.
The Account Holder (and each Authorised Person) agrees not to disclose their Identification Data to third parties.
8. Opposition
The Account Holder must inform the Platform of the loss or theft of their Identification Data, the misappropriation or any unauthorised use of their Personal Space or related data as soon as they become aware of it in order to request that it be blocked. This declaration must be made:
by telephone call to the Platform's Customer Service Department at the number indicated in the General Terms and Conditions of the Website; or
directly by email via the contact form accessible on the Website.
The Service Provider, through the Platform, will immediately carry out the opposition request.
The Service Provider cannot be held responsible for the consequences of an opposition by fax or email that does not come from the Account Holder.
An opposition request is deemed to have been made on the date and time of the actual receipt of the request by the Platform. In the event of theft of the Identification Data or fraudulent use of the Personal Space, the Service Provider is entitled to request, via the Platform, a receipt or a copy of the complaint filed from the Account Holder, who undertakes to respond as soon as possible.
9. Blocking of the Payment Account
The Service Provider reserves the right to block the Payment Account for objectively justified reasons relating to the security of the Payment Account, the presumption of unauthorised or fraudulent use of the Payment Account or the significantly increased risk that the Account Holder will be unable to fulfil its obligation to pay the fees due under this Framework Agreement
10. Disputing a Transaction
10.1. Provisions Common to All Account Holders
For any complaint relating to the Payment Transactions carried out by the Service Provider within the framework hereof, the Account Holder is invited to contact the Platform's Customer Service Department or the address indicated for this purpose in the General Terms and Conditions of the Website.
If the Service Provider carries out an Order with errors due to the Service Provider's fault, the dispute is forwarded to the Service Provider as soon as possible, the Order is cancelled and the Account is restored to the condition it was in before receipt of the Payment Order. Thereafter, the Order is properly represented.
10.2. Provisions Applicable to Professional Account Holders
A Professional Account Holder who wishes to dispute a Transfer Transaction that has not been authorised by it or has been incorrectly implemented must contact the Platform's Customer Service Department by telephone as soon as possible after becoming aware of the anomaly and no later than eight (8) weeks after the transaction has been recorded in the account, and must forward the dispute to the Service Provider as soon as possible. Unless the Service Provider has good reason to suspect fraud on the part of the Account Holder, the Service Provider shall reimburse the Account Holder for the amount of the Transaction immediately upon receipt of the dispute request, and in any event no later than the end of the next Business Day. The Service Provider shall restore the Account to the state in which it would have been if the unauthorised Payment Transaction had not taken place.
In the event of loss or theft of the Identification Data, any unauthorised Transactions carried out prior to the notification of the opposition shall be borne by the Account Holder. Transactions carried out after the opposition are borne by the Service Provider except in the event of fraud by the Account Holder.
10.3. Provisions Applicable to Consumer Account Holders
A Consumer Account Holder who wishes to dispute a Transfer Transaction that has not been authorised by it or has been incorrectly implemented must contact the Platform's Customer Service Department by telephone as soon as possible after becoming aware of the anomaly and no later than thirteen (13) months after the date of debit, and must forward the dispute to the Service Provider as soon as possible. Unless the Service Provider has good reason to suspect fraud on the part of the Account Holder, the Service Provider shall reimburse the Account Holder for the amount of the Transaction immediately upon receipt of the dispute request, and in any event no later than the end of the next Business Day. The Service Provider shall 11 restore the Account to the state in which it would have been if the unauthorised Payment Transaction had not taken place.
In the event of a dispute, the burden of proof that the Transaction has been authenticated, duly recorded and accounted for, and that it has not been affected by a technical or other deficiency is the responsibility of the Service Provider.
In the event of an unauthorised payment transaction resulting from the loss or theft of the Identification Data, the Account Holder shall bear, prior to the notification of the objection, the losses related to the use of the Identification Data, up to a maximum of fifty (50) euros. Transactions carried out after the opposition are borne by the Service Provider except in the event of fraud by the Account Holder. However, the Account Holder shall not be held liable in the event of:
an unauthorised payment transaction carried out without the use of the Identification Data;
loss or theft of Identification Datathat cannot be detected by the Account Holder before payment;
loss due to acts or omissions of an employee, agent or branch of a PSP or of an entity to which its activities have been outsourced.
The Account Holder shall not be held responsible:
if the unauthorised Payment Transaction was carried out by misappropriating the Identification Datawithout the Account Holder's knowledge;
in the event of counterfeiting of Identification Data, if, at the time of the unauthorised Payment Transaction, the Account Holder is in possession of such Data.
The Account Holder shall bear all losses caused by the unauthorised Transactions if such losses result from any fraudulent action on its part or if it has intentionally, through gross negligence, failed to comply with its obligations to maintain the security of its Identification Dataand to notify its opposition in the event of loss, theft or misappropriation of such Data.
11. Financial Conditions
All commissions owed by the Account Holder to the Platform are automatically deducted from the Payment Account by the Service Provider. The Account Holder authorises the Service Provider to compensate at any time, including after the Account has been closed, any definite, liquid and due claim that remains outstanding for any reason whatsoever. It may compensate the provision on the Payment Account against any amount due, payable and unpaid by the Account Holder to the Service Provider.
12. Duration and Termination
The Framework Agreement is concluded for an indefinite period. It comes into force upon its acceptance by the Account Holder.
The latter may, at any time and subject to thirty (30) calendar days' prior notice, terminate the Framework Agreement. The Service Provider may terminate the Framework Agreement at any time, subject to two (2) months' prior notice provided on a Durable Medium. In such a case, the regular fees for Payment Services will be payable by the Account Holder on a pro-rata basis for the period up to the date of termination.
To that end, each Party must send its notice of termination of this Agreement to the other Party, by registered letter with acknowledgement of receipt, to the postal and email address indicated in the General Terms and Conditions of the Website.
As a result, the entire Framework Agreement is terminated and the Payment Account is closed. Any credit on the Account will be transferred within thirteen (13) months to the Account Holder's Bank Account following the deduction of the fees due and payable to the Service Provider.
In the event of serious breaches, fraud, or unpaid debts on the part of the Account Holder, the Service Provider reserves the right to suspend or terminate this Agreement by sending an email accompanied by a registered letter with acknowledgement of receipt without reason or prior notice.
It is intended that the Framework Agreement will be automatically terminated in the event of new circumstances affecting a Party's ability to commit hereunder.
13. Amendment of the Agreement
The Service Provider reserves the right to amend the Framework Agreement at any time. Any draft amendment of the Framework Agreement is provided to the Account Holder by the Platform.
Any Account Holder may refuse the proposed amendments and must notify its refusal to the Platform's Customer Service Department by registered letter with acknowledgement of receipt two (2) months before the date of entry into force of the proposed amendments (postmark recognised as affording proof) to the address indicated in the General Terms and Conditions of the Website.
If the Account Holder has not notified its refusal prior to the indicated date of entry into force, the Account Holder is deemed to have accepted the proposed amendments. Relations between the Parties after the date of entry into force will then be governed by the new version of the Framework Agreement.
In the event of refusal by the Account Holder, this refusal will give rise, free of charge, to the termination of the Framework Agreement, as well as the transfer of the balance of the Payment Account within thirteen (13) months following the effective date of the termination in order to cover any future disputes.
Any legislative or regulatory provisions that would make it necessary to amend all or part of the Framework Agreement will be applicable as from their date of entry into force, without prior notice. However, the Account Holder will be informed.
14. Security
The Service Provider undertakes to provide its services in compliance with the applicable laws and regulations and best practices. In particular, the Service Provider will make every effort to ensure the security and confidentiality of the Account Holders' data, in accordance with the regulations in force.
The Service Provider reserves the right to temporarily suspend access to the Online Account for technical, security or maintenance reasons without these operations giving the right to any compensation. It undertakes to limit this type of interruption to what is strictly necessary.
However, the Service Provider cannot be held liable to the Account Holder for any errors, omissions, interruptions or delays in operations carried out via the Website resulting from unauthorised access thereto. Furthermore, the Service Provider cannot be held liable for theft, destruction or unauthorised communication of data resulting from unauthorised access to the Website. In addition, the Service Provider is not involved in the legal relationship between the Account Holder and a User or between the Account Holder and the Website. The Service Provider cannot be held liable for the faults, shortcomings or negligence of a User and the Account Holder towards each other, or of the Website and the Account Holder towards each other.
If the unique identifier or any other information necessary for the implementation of a Payment Transaction provided by the Account Holder is inaccurate, the Service Provider shall not be liable for the improper implementation of such Service.
The Platform is solely responsible for the security and confidentiality of the data exchanged in the context of the use of the Website in accordance with the General Terms and Conditions of the Website, with the Service Provider being responsible for the security and confidentiality of the data that it exchanges with the Account Holder in the context of this Agreement in connection with the creation and management of its Account, as well as the Payment Transactions associated with the Account.
15. Limitation of the Service Provider's Liability
The Service Provider shall not intervene in any way in the legal and commercial relations and any disputes arising between the Account Holder and the User or between the Account Holder and the Platform or between the Account Holder and a Beneficiary. The Service Provider has no control over the conformity, security, legality, characteristics and adequacy of the products and services that are the subject of a Payment Transaction.
Each transaction carried out by the Account Holder gives rise to an agreement, directly formed between the Account Holder and a User, in which the Service Provider is not involved. Consequently, the latter may not be held liable for the non-implementation or improper implementation of the obligations resulting therefrom, nor for any damage caused to the Account Holder.
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Agreement, the Service Provider's liability towards an Account Holder is limited to compensation for direct damages as provided for in the regulations.
16. Commitments of the Account Holder
The Account Holder guarantees that nothing in their Personal Space infringes the rights of third parties or is contrary to the law, public order or morality.
The Account Holder undertakes not to:
Implement the Framework Agreement in an unlawful manner or under conditions that may damage, disable, overburden or impair the Website;
Impersonate the identity of another person or entity, falsify or conceal their identity, age or create a false identity;
Distribute personal information or information relating to a third party, such as postal addresses, telephone numbers, email addresses, bank card numbers, etc. In the event of failure to comply with its obligations, the Service Provider may take all appropriate measures to cease the actions concerned. The Service Provider will also be entitled to suspend, delete and/or block the Account Holder's access to their Account.
Without prejudice to any legal action taken by third parties, the Service Provider is entitled to take any legal action in its own right to compensate for any damage that it may have personally suffered as a result of the Account Holder's failure to comply with its obligations under this Agreement.
If the Account Holder notices a breach of the above obligations, the Account Holder is invited to inform the Service Provider of such actions by contacting the Service Provider at: legal@mangopay.com.
17. Right of Withdrawal
17.1. Provisions Applicable to Consumer Account Holders
Under the terms of Article L222-7 of the French Consumer Code, a Consumer Account Holder has a right of withdrawal that can be exercised within a period of fourteen (14) days without having to provide any reason or incur any penalty. This withdrawal period begins either from the day of the conclusion of the Framework Agreement or from receipt of the contractual conditions and information, if the latter date is later than that of the conclusion of the Framework Agreement. The implementation of the Framework Agreement may only be initiated before the expiry of the withdrawal period with the consent of the Consumer Account Holder. The Consumer Account Holder acknowledges that the use of the Payment Services after the conclusion of the Framework Agreement will constitute an express request on its part to start the implementation of the Framework Agreement before the expiry of the above-mentioned deadline. The exercise of the right of withdrawal entails the termination of the Framework Agreement, which, in the event of initiation of implementation, consists of cancellation and does not call into question the services previously provided. In this case, the Consumer Account Holder will only be required to pay proportionally for the Services actually provided.
17.2. Exercising the Right of Withdrawal
The Account Holder must notify the Platform's Customer Service Department by telephone or email within the specified period and send a confirmation letter to the address of the Platform's Customer Service Department. For this purpose, they can use the withdrawal form provided by the Platform
18. Rules Regarding the Fight against Money Laundering and the Financing of Terrorism
The Service Provider is subject to all Luxembourg and French regulations relating to the fight against money laundering and the financing of terrorism.
Pursuant to the provisions of French and Luxembourg law relating to the participation of financial institutions in the fight against money laundering and the financing of terrorist activities, the Service Provider is required to obtain information from all Account Holders for all transactions or business relationships as to the origin, purpose and destination of the transaction or the opening of the Account. The Service Provider must also take all necessary steps to identify the Account Holder and, where applicable, the beneficial owner of the Account and/or the Payment Transactions linked to it.
The Account Holder acknowledges that the Service Provider may, at any time, terminate or postpone the use of Identification Data, access to an Account or the implementation of a Transaction in the absence of sufficient information regarding its purpose or nature. The Account Holder is informed that a transaction carried out hereunder may be subject to the exercise of the national financial intelligence unit's right of disclosure.
The Account Holder may, in accordance with the regulations, access all information thereby communicated, provided that this right of access does not jeopardise the purpose of the fight against money laundering and the financing of terrorism when this data relates to the applicant.
No legal action or civil action may be brought or any professional sanction imposed against the Service Provider, its managers or employees who have made declarations of suspicion in good faith to their national authorities.
19. personal information Protection
The Service Provider shall collect and process all personal information in accordance with the regulations in force applicable to the protection of such Data and, in particular, with Law No. 78-17 of 6 January 1978 as 15 amended and with European Regulation 2016/679 of the European Parliament and of the Council of 27 April 2016.
The personal information required at the time of subscription is necessary within the framework of the services provided in accordance herewith. Failure to provide the mandatory personal information may result in the applicant being refused access to the services.
The Data Subject is informed that personal information is collected in particular for the following purposes: the provision of the services provided as described herein; the fight against money laundering and the financing of terrorism; the processing of requests for information and complaints; the production of statistics. These processing operations are, in particular, necessary for the implementation of the Framework Agreement and to comply with the legal obligations to which the data controllers are subject. The Provider and the Platform act as joint controllers of this processing.
personal information will not be transmitted to third parties without the express consent of the Data Subjects. However, the Data Subject is informed that personal information is transmitted to subcontractors of the Service Provider, for the aforementioned purposes. The aforementioned subcontractors shall act only on the instructions of the Service Provider and exclusively on behalf of the latter.
The Data Subject concerned can access the list of subcontractors by sending their request to the Platform's Customer Service Department. The Data Subject is informed that the Service Provider shall ensure that its subcontractors take all necessary measures to preserve the security and confidentiality of personal information. In the event of the occurrence of a Data breach (loss, intrusion, destruction, etc.) involving high risks for the Data Subject concerned, the latter will be informed.
The Service Provider reserves the right to disclose personal information at the request of a legal authority to comply with any applicable law or regulation, to protect or defend the rights of the Account Holder or a Data Subject, if justified by compelling circumstances, or to protect the security of the Account Holder, the Services or the public.
personal information processed by the Service Provider within the framework of the services provided in accordance herewith shall be retained for the period of time strictly necessary to achieve the purposes mentioned above. Unless otherwise provided by law and regulations, the Data will not be retained beyond the effective date of termination of the Agreement. In particular, it is specified that personal information relating to identification is kept for a period of five (5) years from the end of the contractual relationship, pursuant to the regulations applicable to the fight against money laundering and the financing of terrorism.
Data Subjects have the following rights over their Data, in accordance with the conditions set out in the regulations: right of access, right of rectification, right of opposition, right of deletion, right to limit processing and right of portability. A Data Subject may, at any time, exercise their rights by contacting the Platform's Customer Service Department. The application must indicate the applicant's surname, first name and identifier, and be accompanied by a photocopy of an identity document bearing the applicant's signature.
A response will be sent to the Data Subject within one (1) month following receipt of their request. This period may be extended by two (2) months, depending on the complexity and number of requests. In this case, the Data Subject will be informed of the extension and the reasons for the postponement within one (1) month of receipt of the request.
The Data Subject is informed that they have the right to submit a complaint to the competent authority for any request relating to their personal information.
If the Data Subject submits their request in electronic form, the response will be provided electronically, unless they expressly request otherwise.
Where the personal information relates to a Data Subject who is not a party to the Framework Agreement and has been transmitted by the Account Holder, the Account Holder is responsible for communicating the information in this Article to the Data Subject.
Further information regarding the processing of personal information carried out within the framework of this Agreement, the retention periods and the rights of Data Subjects is available in the Service Provider's Privacy Policy (accessible on the website
www.mangopay.com
).
20. Professional Security
The Service Provider is bound by professional secrecy. However, this secrecy may be lifted, in accordance with the legislation in force, by virtue of a regulatory and prudential legal obligation, in particular, at the request of the supervisory authorities, the tax or customs administration, as well as that of the criminal court or, in the event of a court order, notified to the Service Provider. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the User is entitled to release the Service Provider from the obligation of professional secrecy by expressly indicating to the Service Provider the third parties authorised to receive confidential information concerning the User.
It is specified that professional secrecy may be lifted by the effect of the regulations in favour of companies providing the Service Provider with important operational tasks within the framework of this Agreement.
21. Intellectual Property
The Service Provider shall retain full ownership of the property titles and rights of any kind attached to the Services offered to the Account Holder. None of these property rights are transferred to the Account Holder hereunder.
22. Death of the Account Holder and Inactive Accounts
22.1. Death of the Account Holder
The death of the Account Holder terminates the Framework Agreement as soon as it is brought to the attention of the Service Provider. Transactions taking place following the death are, except with the agreement of the successors or the notary in charge of the estate, considered as not having been authorised.
The Payment Account will remain open for the time necessary to settle the estate and the Service Provider shall ensure the settlement of the balance with the agreement of the successors or the notary in charge of the estate.
22.1. Inactive Accounts
Any inactive Account may be subject to a notification of inactivity sent via email by the Service Provider followed by a reminder one (1) month later. The Account Holder's Payment Account is considered inactive when, at the end of a period of twelve (12) months, it has not been the subject of any transaction (other than the charging of management fees) at the initiative of the Account Holder (or any authorised representative) and they have not communicated with the Service Provider in any form whatsoever.
If there is no response and no use of the balance credited to the Account within this period, the Service Provider may close the Account and maintain it for the sole purpose of transferring the amounts due to the account indicated by the Account Holder. In the event of death, the balance can only be refunded to the 17 Account Holder's successors.
The Account will no longer be allowed to carry out Payment Transactions.
23. Force majeure
The Parties shall not be held liable or considered as having failed hereunder, in the event of a delay or nonimplementation, when their cause is related to force majeure as defined by Article 1218 of the French Civil Code.
If one or more of the provisions hereof should become null and void or be declared as such in application of a law, a regulation or following a final decision given by a competent court, the other provisions shall retain their mandatory force and scope. The stipulations declared null and void would then be replaced by the stipulations that come closest in meaning and scope to the stipulations initially agreed upon.
24. Independence of Contractual Stipulations
If any provision hereof is held to be null or void, it shall be treated as if it had never existed and shall not invalidate the other stipulations.
If one or more of the provisions hereof should become null and void or be declared as such in application of a law, a regulation or following a final decision given by a competent court, the other provisions shall retain their mandatory force and scope. The stipulations declared null and void would then be replaced by the stipulations that come closest in meaning and scope to the stipulations initially agreed upon.
25. Protection of Funds
The Account Holder's funds are deposited, at the end of the Business Day following the day on which they were received by the Service Provider, in an escrow account opened in the records of a Bank under the conditions required by the regulations.
Pursuant to Article 24-10 (5) of the Law of 20 May 2011 published in Mémorial A No. 104 of 24 May 2011 of the Grand Duchy of Luxembourg and Article 14 of the Law of 10 November 2009 published in Mémorial A No. 215 of 11 November 2009 of the Grand Duchy of Luxembourg, transposing Directive 2009/110/EC of the European Parliament and of the Council of 16 September 2009 concerning access to the activity of electronic money institutions, the funds collected are protected and do not fall into the electronic money institution's assets in the event of its liquidation, bankruptcy or any other state of support.
26. Non-Assignability
The Framework Agreement may not be transferred in whole or in part by the Account Holder, whether in return for payment or free of charge. The Account Holder is hereby prohibited from transferring any of its rights or obligations hereunder to a third party. In the event of failure to comply with this prohibition, in addition to the immediate termination hereof, the Account Holder may be held liable by the Service Provider.
27. Agreement on Evidence
All data contained in an unalterable, reliable and secure manner in the Service Provider's computer database, in particular, relating to Payment Orders and notifications sent, shall be deemed authentic between the Parties until proven otherwise.
28. Complaints and Mediation
The Account Holder is invited to contact the Platform's Customer Service Department, which may be indicated on the Website, for any complaint.
Any complaint other than that provided for in Article 10 concerning the conclusion, implementation or termination of the Framework Agreement must be notified by email to the following address: complaint@mangopay.com.
The Account Holder agrees that the Service Provider may respond to their complaints on a Durable Medium. The response will be sent as soon as possible and no later than fifteen (15) Business Days following receipt of the complaint by the Service Provider. However, for reasons beyond its control, the Service Provider may not be able to respond within this period of fifteen (15) days. In this case, it shall communicate to the Account Holder a response specifying the reasons for this additional time and the date on which it will send the final response. In any event, the Account Holder will receive a final response no later than thirty-five (35) Business Days following receipt of the complaint.
The Account Holder is informed that the CSSF (Commission de Surveillance du Secteur Financier) is competent to settle, on an extrajudicial basis, disputes relating to the implementation of this Framework Agreement. For more information regarding the CSSF and the conditions of such recourse, you may contact the Platform's Customer Service Department or consult the CSFF website (
http://www.cssf.lu
). Applications for mediation must be addressed to the Ombudsman of the Commission de Surveillance du Secteur Financier (CSSF), 283 route d'Arlon, L-1150 Luxembourg (direction@cssf.lu), without prejudice to other legal remedies. However, the matter may not be referred to the Ombudsman if the application is clearly unfounded or abusive, if the dispute has been previously examined or is being examined by another Ombudsman or by a court, if the application to the Ombudsman is submitted more than one (1) year after the written complaint to the Service Provider, or if the dispute does not fall within the Ombudsman's field of competence.
29. Applicable Law and Jurisdiction
Except in the event of application of a law of public order (which will apply only within the strict limits of its purpose), it is expressly stipulated that the Framework Agreement is subject to French law. Any dispute between the Parties in respect of the Framework Agreement will be subject to the jurisdiction of the competent French courts.
We use cookies
Gudog uses cookies and similar technologies to enhance your experience and personalise ads. Some are essential, while others help us analyse traffic and improve our service for you. We may share data, such as unique identifiers, with analytics and advertising partners. For more details, please see our
Privacy Policy
.
Accept all
Reject all
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://gudog.co.uk/terms/privacy_policy:
Gudog Privacy Policy
Scope of this Privacy Policy
Last updated: 18 December 2023
HouseMyDog Ltd ("Gudog", "we", "our", or "us") is committed to protecting and respecting your privacy. This privacy policy explains how we collect and use your personal information when you use the Gudog Service or when you otherwise interact with us.
Gudog operates a service which connects dog owners with dog sitters who wish to host dogs and/or offer other dog related services using our website at gudog.com and mobile application that we make available (the "Service").
Before using our Service, we encourage you to review this Privacy Policy to ensure that you have understood our collection, storage, use and disclosure of your personal information.
This policy does not apply to websites, applications, or services that display or link to other privacy policies.
This privacy policy should be read alongside, and in addition to, our Terms of Service.
Gudog is the data controller of the personal information we hold about you.
Information Collected by Gudog
Information necessary to use the Gudog Service.
We ask for and collect the following personal information about you when you use the Gudog Service. This information is necessary for the adequate performance of the contract between you and us and to allow us to comply with our legal obligations. Without it, we may not be able to provide you with all the requested services voluntarily by the User.
Account Information. When you sign up for a Gudog Account, we require certain information such as your first name, last name, your address and email address.
Profile and Listing Information. To use certain features of the Gudog Service (such as booking or creating a Listing), we may ask you to provide additional information, which may include your address, phone number, and a profile picture.
Verification. To create and maintain a trusted community, we may collect identity verification information such as a copy of official government identification.
Payment Information. To use certain features of the Gudog Service (such as booking or creating a Listing), we may require you to provide certain financial information (like your bank account or credit card information) in order to facilitate the processing of payments. Gudog uses a third-party payment provider and as such the Payment Information is not visible to Gudog.
Communications with Gudog and other Members. When you communicate with Gudog or use the Gudog Service to communicate with other Members, we collect information about your communication and any information you choose to provide. Gudog may review, scan, or analyse the User’s communications on the Service for fraud prevention, risk assessment, regulatory compliance, investigation, product development and customer support purposes. In some cases, Gudog may also scan, review, or analyse messages to debug, improve, and expand product offerings. Gudog uses automated methods where reasonably possible. However, occasionally Gudog may need to manually review some communications, such as for fraud investigations and customer support, or to assess and improve the functionality of these automated tools. Gudog will not review, scan, or analyse the User’s communications to send third party marketing messages to the User, and Gudog will not sell reviews or analyses of these communications. These activities are carried out based on Gudog's legitimate interest in ensuring compliance with applicable laws and Gudog’s Terms of Use, preventing fraud, promoting safety, and improving and ensuring the adequate performance of Gudog’s services.
Information the User chooses to provide.
You may choose to provide us with additional personal information in order to obtain a better user experience when using Gudog.
Additional Profile Information. You may choose to provide additional information as part of your Gudog profile (such as preferred language, city, and a personal description) as part of your public profile page, and will be publicly visible to others.
Other Information. You may otherwise choose to provide us information when you fill in a form, conduct a search, update or add information to your Gudog Account, respond to surveys, post to community forums, participate in promotions, or use other features of the Gudog Service.
Information automatically collected by Gudog.
When you use Gudog, we automatically collect information, including personal information, about the services you use and how you use them. This information is necessary for the adequate performance of the contract between you and us, to enable us to comply with legal obligations and given our legitimate interest to provide and improve Gudog.
Geo-location Information. When you use certain features of the Gudog Service, we may collect information about your precise or approximate location as determined through data such as your IP address or mobile device’s GPS to offer you an improved user experience. Most mobile devices allow you to control or disable the use of location services for applications in the device’s settings menu. Gudog may also collect this information even when you are not using the app if this connection is enabled through your settings or device permissions.
Usage information to Log Data. We collect information about your interactions with the Gudog Service such as the pages or content you view, your searches for Listings, bookings you have made, and other actions on the Gudog Service.
Usage information to Log Data. Log Data and Cookies. We automatically collect log data and device information such as details about how a person has used the Service, IP address of the used device, browser type or the webpage software information a person has visited before coming to the Service, access dates and times, hardware and software information, device event information, unique identifiers and Cookies data (collected when a person accesses and uses the Service even without creating an Account or log in) – this information is used to verify that visitors of the Service meet the criteria required to process their requests.
Cookies and Similar Technologies. We use cookies and other similar technologies, such as web beacons, pixels, and mobile identifiers. We may also allow our business partners to use these tracking technologies on the Gudog Service, or engage others to track your behaviour on our behalf. You may disable the use of Cookies through your browser settings.
Payment Transaction Information. Gudog collects information related to your payment transactions through the Gudog Service, including the payment instrument used, date and time, payment amount, payment instrument expiration date and billing postcode, PayPal email address, IBAN information, your address and other related transaction details.
Information Gudog collects from third parties.
Third Party Services. If you link, connect, or login to your Gudog Account with a third-party service (e.g. Google, Facebook), the third-party service may send us information such as your registration and profile information from that service. This information varies and is controlled by that service or as authorised by you via your privacy settings at that service.
Your References. If someone has written a reference for you, it may be published on your Gudog public profile page with your consent.
Background Checks. To the extent permitted by applicable laws and with the User’s consent where required, Gudog may obtain the local version of police, background or registered sex offender checks. Gudog may use the User’s information to obtain such reports.
Other Sources. To the extent permitted by applicable law Gudog may receive additional information about you, such as demographic data or fraud detection information, from third party service providers and/or partners, and combine it with information we have about you. For example, we may receive background check results (with your consent where required) or fraud warnings from service providers like identity verification services for our fraud prevention and risk assessment efforts. We may receive information about you and your activities on and off the Gudog Service through partnerships, or about your experiences and interactions from our partner ad networks.
How Gudog Uses The Information We Collect
Provide, improve and develop the Gudog Service.
Enable the User to access and use the Service.
Enable the User to communicate with other Users.
Operate, protect, improve and optimise the Service and experience such as by performing analytics and conducting research.
Provide customer service.
Send the User service or support messages, updates, security alerts and account notifications.
Facilitate the User’s referral invitations.
Send User’s requests for references.
Provide fraud detection and prevention.
Provide any other services authorised by the User at the time of collection of the personal information.
Operate, protect, improve and optimise the Service and experience and personalise and customise the User’s experience (such as making listing suggestions or ranking search results), Gudog conducts profiling base on the User’s interaction with Gudog, the User’s search and booking history, the User’s profile information and preferences, and other User Content submitted to Gudog.
Gudog processes this information given its legitimate interest in improving the Service and the Users’ experience with it, and where it is necessary for the adequate performance of the contract with the User.
Create and maintain a trusted and safer community.
Detect and prevent fraud, spam, abuse, security incidents, and other harmful activity.
Conduct security investigations and risk assessments.
Verify or authenticate information or identifications provided by the User (such as to verify the User’s accommodation address or compare the User’s identification photo to another photo the User provided).
Conduct checks against databases and other information sources, including background or police checks, to the extent permitted by applicable laws and with the User’s consent where required.
Comply with Gudog’s legal obligations.
Resolve any disputes with any of the Users and enforce Gudog’s agreements with third parties.
Enforce Gudog’s Terms of Use and other policies.
Gudog may conduct profiling based on the User’s interactions with the Service, the User’s profile information and other content the User submits to the Service, and information obtained from third parties.
Gudog may restrict or suspend access to the Service if we judge that the User or activity poses a safety or other risk to Gudog, other Users, or third parties.
Gudog processes this information given its legitimate interest in protecting Gudog, to measure the adequate performance of Gudog’s contract with the User, and to comply with applicable laws.
Provide, personalise and improve Gudog’s marketing.
Send the User promotional messages, marketing, advertising, and other information that may be of interest to the User based on his/her preferences (including information about Gudog or partner campaigns and services) and social media advertising through social media Services such as Facebook or Google).
Personalise, measure, and improve Gudog’s advertising.
Administer referral programs, rewards, surveys, sweepstakes, contests, or other promotional activities or events sponsored or managed by Gudog or its third-party partners.
Conduct profiling on the User’s characteristics and preferences (based on the information the User provides to Gudog, the User’s interactions with the Service and Gudog, information obtained from third parties, and the User’s search and booking history) to send the User promotional messages, marketing, advertising and other information that Gudog thinks may be of interest to the User.
Gudog processes this information given its legitimate interest in undertaking marketing activities to offer the User products or services that may be of the User’s interest. The User can opt-out of receiving marketing communications from Gudog by following the unsubscribe instructions included in Gudog’s marketing communications.
Payment information collected.
Detect and prevent fraud, abuse, security incidents, and other harmful activity.
Conduct security investigations and risk assessments.
Conduct checks against databases and other information sources.
Comply with legal obligations (such as anti-money laundering regulations).
Send the User promotional messages, marketing, advertising, and other information that may be of interest to the User based on his/her preferences.
Gudog processes this information given its legitimate interest in the adequate performance of the contract with the User and to comply with applicable laws.
Storing and Processing of You personal information
Security.
Gudog uses appropriate technical and organisational measures to protect your personal information against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, change or damage. All personal information we collect will be stored on secure servers and all electronic transactions entered into via our Service will be protected by SSL encryption technology.
If you suspect any misuse, loss or unauthorised access to your data, please let us know immediately via email at info@gudog.com
We have put in place procedures to deal with any suspected personal information breach and will notify you and any applicable regulator of a breach where we are legally required to do so.
International Transfers of your personal information.
personal information we collect may be stored and processed in your country or in any other country where we or our affiliates, subsidiaries, or service providers maintain facilities. These processing locations are chosen to increase efficiency and performance, and to protect information in the event of an outage or other problem.
We will only transfer personal information outside the European Economic Area where it is compliant with data protection legislation and the means of transfer provides adequate safeguards, such as standard data protection directives issued by the European Commission. To enquire further about these safeguards you can contact us using the contact details at the end of this privacy policy.
Period.
Gudog will only retain your data for as long as necessary to answer queries or resolve problems, provide improved and new services, or for other essential purposes such as complying with our legal obligations, resolving disputes, and enforcing our agreements, or until you request that the data be deleted.
In some instances your data may persist, even after an erasure request, on backup or archival media for legal, tax or regulatory purposes.
In some instances we may anonymise your data for research or statistical purposes in which case we may use this information indefinitely without further notice to you.
Sharing Data
Disclosure to business partners
Gudog has the right to disclose some of the personal information (i.e. list of Pet Sitters) to its business partners for the performance or delivery of the services offered by Gudog. Without prejudice to the foregoing, Gudog shall not disclose any of personal information (apart from the personal information visible on the site or Service) to any third parties for indirect marketing purposes without the consent of the User.
Sharing between Users
To help facilitate bookings or other interactions between Users, Gudog may need to share certain information, including personal information, with other Users, as it is necessary for the adequate performance of the contract between the User and Gudog, as follows:
When you as the Pet Sitter have confirmed a booking, certain information is shared with the Pet Owner to coordinate the booking, such as the Pet Sitter’s full name.
Gudog does not share User’s billing and payout information with other Users.
When the Pet Owner submits a booking request, certain information about him/her is shared with the Pet Sitter, including the Pet Owner’s full name, and other information he/she agrees to share. When the Pet Owner’s booking is confirmed, Gudog will disclose additional information to assist with coordinating the trip, like the Pet Owner’s phone number.
Profiles, Listings, and other Public Information.
Gudog lets the User publish information, including personal information that is visible to the general public. For example:
Parts of the User’s public profile page, such as the User’s first name, the User’s description, and city are publicly visible to others.
Listing pages are publicly visible and include information such as listing description, calendar availability, the User’s public profile photo, and any additional information the User chooses to share.
After completing a booking, Pet Owner may write a review and rate the Pet Sitter. Reviews and ratings are a part of the Pet Sitter’s public profile page and may also be surfaced elsewhere on the Service.
If the User submits any content in a community or discussion forum, blog or social media post, or use a similar feature on the Service, that content is publicly visible.
Based on Gudog’s legitimate interest to promote the Service, Gudog may display parts of the Service (e.g., the User’s listing page) on sites operated by Gudog’s business partners, using technologies such as widgets or APIs. If the User’s listings are displayed on a partner’s site, information from the User’s public profile page may also be displayed.
Information the User shares publicly on the Service may be indexed through third party search engines. In some cases, the User may opt-out of this feature in the Account settings. If the User changes the settings or his/her public-facing content, these search engines may not update the Users’ databases. Gudog does not control the practices of third party search engines, and they may use caches containing the User’s outdated information.
Service Providers
Gudog uses a variety of third-party service providers to help Gudog provide services. Service providers may be located inside or outside of the European Economic Area (“EEA”). For example, service providers may help Gudog to: (i) verify the User‘s identity or authenticate the User‘s identification documents, (ii) check information against public databases, (iii) conduct background or police checks, fraud prevention, and risk assessment, (iv) perform product development, maintenance and debugging, (v) allow the provision of Gudog‘s services through third party Services and software tools (e.g. through the integration with our APIs), or (vi) provide customer service, advertising, or payments services. These providers have limited access to the User‘s personal information to perform these tasks on Gudog‘s behalf and are contractually bound to protect and to use it only for the purposes for which it was disclosed and consistent with this Privacy Policy.
Gudog will need to share the User‘s information, including personal information, in order to ensure the adequate performance of Gudog‘s contract with the User.
Social Media Services
Where permissible according to applicable law Gudog may use certain limited personal information about the User, such as the User‘s email address, to hash it and to share it with social media Services, such as Facebook or Google, to generate leads, drive traffic to the Service or otherwise promote Gudog‘s products and services or the Service. These processing activities are based on Gudog’s legitimate interest in undertaking marketing activities to offer the User products or services that may be if the User‘s interest.
The social media Services with which Gudog may share the User’s personal information are not controlled or supervised by Gudog. Therefore, any questions regarding how the User‘s social media service platform provider processes his/her personal information should be directed to such provider.
Corporate Affiliates
To help us provide the Gudog Service, we may share your information within our corporate family of companies (both financial and non-financial entities) that are related by common ownership or control. These related entities are covered under this Privacy Policy, and when services have additional terms specific to them, we tell you through the Gudog Service.
Legal & Law Enforcement
Gudog may disclose your personal information to courts, law enforcement, governmental or public authorities, tax authorities, authorised third parties, if and to the extent we are required or permitted to do so by law or where disclosure is reasonably necessary to: (i) comply with our legal obligations, (ii) comply with a valid legal request (such as a court order) or to respond to claims asserted against Gudog, (iii) respond to a valid legal request relating to a criminal investigation to address alleged or suspected illegal activity, or to respond to or address any other activity that may expose us, you, or any other of our users to legal or regulatory liability.
Where legally required according to applicable law, we may disclose your personal information to tax authorities or other governmental agencies for the purpose of the tax authorities’ determination of proper compliance with relevant tax obligations. Information that may be disclosed includes, but is not limited to your; name, addresses, tax or VAT identification number(s), date of birth, contact information, payout information, transaction dates and amounts, gross and net booking value and payout amounts, or taxes collected by Gudog, to the extent any of this information is known by Gudog.
Business Transfers
If Gudog undertakes or is involved in any merger, acquisition, reorganization, sale of assets, bankruptcy, or insolvency event, then we may sell, transfer or share some or all of our assets, including your information. In this event, we will notify you before your personal information is transferred and becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Aggregated Data
We may also share aggregated information (information about our users that we combine together so that it no longer identifies or references an individual user) and non-personally identifiable information for industry and market analysis, demographic profiling, marketing and advertising, and other business purposes.
Cookie Policy
Gudog uses Cookies to distinguish the Users’ preferences and to offer better functionality of the Service. At the moment of the first access to the Service, the User accepts different kinds of Cookies used by the Service. Otherwise (in case of the lack of such acceptance), the User shall delete his/her Account. The User can block Cookies by activating the User’s browser settings which allow the User to refuse the Cookies. The rejection of these Cookies may have the effect of not allowing the User to use some functionalities of the Gudog Service. More information on Cookies can be found via the following link:
www.allaboutcookies.org
Gudog uses session cookies (which expire once the User logs out from the Account) and persistent cookies (which stay on the User’s device for a set period of time or until the User delete them). The following types of cookies are used by Gudog for the purposes explained in this overview:
Strictly necessary Cookies. For providing a possibility to use the Service or providing certain functions the User requested.
Functionality Cookies. For improvement of the functionality of the Service.
Tracking Cookies. This type of Cookies survives the User’s session. When the max-age of a permanent cookie is set at one year, then, within that year, the initial value – stored in that Cookie – shall be sent back to the server each time the User visits the server – the purpose is to save a vital piece of information, such as how the User initially came to the App.
Performance Cookies. For improving the functionality of the Service. The Service uses Cookies connected with Google Analytics to analyse how the Users use the Service. It records the number of visitors and it provides Gudog with information on their overall behaviour - such as the typical duration of a visit to the Service or the number of pages a user views on average.
Third party cookies: When interacting with the Service, several third party cookies are stored in your browser by some of our analytics/performance providers and marketing partners.
The Service may contain electronic images known as Web beacons, which are used to compile aggregated statistics to analyse how the Service is used and may be used in emails to let us know which emails and links have been opened by recipients.
Your Legal Rights in Respect of Your personal information
In accordance with European Union privacy law, you have the following rights in respect of your personal information that we hold:
Right to access: to request copies of the information we hold about you. Where we are legally permitted to do so, we may refuse a right of access request for specific legal reasons which will be notified to you, if applicable, at the time of your request.
Right to correct: to have incomplete or inaccurate data we hold about you corrected We may need to verify the accuracy of the new data provided.
Right to erase: to have the data we hold about you delete or removed from our systems. We may not always be able to comply with your request of erasure for specific legal reasons which will be notified to you, if applicable, at the time of your request.
Right to object: to the processing of your personal information when a serious and legitimate reason arises.
Right to restrict our use of your data: to restrict us from using your data or limit the way in which we can use it.
Right to withdraw consent: of your personal information at any time for our future processing.
Right to data portability: to request your data in a format in which it can be transferred to another provider.
If you wish to exercise any of the rights set out above, please use the contact details provided at the end of this privacy policy. We aim to respond to all requests within 30 days. We may need to request specific information from you to help us confirm your identity or to ask for further information to clarify your request.
If you are not satisfied with the way your data is handled by us you have the right to lodge a complaint with the relevant data protection authority in your country, but we encourage you to first contact us with any questions or concerns.
Links To Third party Sites
Our Service may, from time to time, contain links to and from third party websites, including, but not limited to, those of other users, our partner networks, advertisers, partner merchants, news publications, retailers and affiliates. If you follow a link to any of these websites, please note that these websites may be collecting information from you when you are browsing and have their own privacy policies; we do not accept any responsibility or liability for their collection activities or policies. Please check the individual policies before you submit any information to those websites.
Gudog is not liable for any links that may be found in the Service, which lead and/or allow the User to directly enter any third-party websites, nor for any potential personal information protection infringements that could occur in connection with browsing such websites. Because of that the User shall acknowledge any privacy provisions which may be found on such third-party websites.
Safety Of personal information
In the event of and following discovery or notification of a breach of the security of the personal information, or access by an unauthorised person, Gudog will notify the User if the breach is likely to affect the User’s privacy.
The User is obliged to comply with safety standards, for instance by avoiding all non-authorised access to the User’s devices and the Account. The User is solely responsible for the use of the Service on the User’s devices, IP-address and identification data, as well as for its confidentiality.
Notwithstanding the security measures and policy adopted by Gudog, an infallible level of security cannot be guaranteed. Since no method of transmission or forwarding over the Internet or any method of electronic storage is 100% secure, Gudog does not guarantee absolute security.
Our Policy Towards Children
Our Service is not directed at persons under 18 and we do not knowingly collect personal information from children. If you become aware that your child has provided us with personal information, without your consent, then please contact us using the details below so that we can take steps to remove such information and terminate any account your child has created with us.
Changes To This Policy and Your Duty to Inform us of Changes
Changes to this privacy policy will be immediately posted on our website and you are deemed to have accepted the terms of the privacy policy on your first use of the website following the alterations.
It is important that the personal information we hold about you is accurate and current. Please keep us informed if your personal information changes during your relationship with us.
Notice To You
If we need to provide you with information about something, whether for legal, marketing or other business related purposes, we will select what we believe is the best way to get in contact with you. We will usually do this through email or by placing a notice on our Service. The fact that we may send notices to you will not stop you from being able to opt out of certain types of contact as described in this privacy policy.
Governing Law And Jurisdiction
This Privacy Statement is governed by the laws of Ireland and is subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the Irish courts.
Contact Details
If you have any questions or comments regarding our Privacy Policy, please contact Gudog
info@gudog.com
We use cookies
Gudog uses cookies and similar technologies to enhance your experience and personalise ads. Some are essential, while others help us analyse traffic and improve our service for you. We may share data, such as unique identifiers, with analytics and advertising partners. For more details, please see our
Privacy Policy
.
Accept all
Reject all